Utah statutes.
73-22-10.   Judicial review of division actions -- Falsification or omission
of filings as misdemeanor -- Limitation of actions.
(1) (a)  Any person aggrieved by any order issued under this chapter may
obtain judicial review.
(b)  Venue for judicial review of informal adjudicative proceedings is in the
district court of Salt Lake County, or in the district court of the county in
which the complaining person resides.
(2)  An action or appeal involving any provision of this chapter, or a rule or
order issued under it shall be determined as expeditiously as possible.
(3)  Any person who, for the purpose of evading this chapter or any order of
the division issued under it, makes or causes to be made any false entry in
any report, record, account, or memorandum required by this chapter, or by any
order issued under it, or omits or causes to be omitted from the report,
record, account, or memorandum, full, true, and correct entries as required by
this chapter, or by an order, or removes from this state or destroys,
mutilates, alters, or falsifies the record, account, or memorandum, is guilty
of a class A misdemeanor.
(4)  No suit, action, or other proceeding based upon a violation of this
chapter or any order of the division issued under it may be begun or
maintained unless the action is begun within two years from the date of the
alleged violation.
